Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-10,104
Licensing of agents.

(1) Agents of societies shall be licensed in accordance with the laws regulating the licensing, revocation, suspension, or termination of license of resident and nonresident agents.

(2) No examination or license shall be required of any regular salaried officer, employee, or member of a licensed society who devotes substantially all of his or her services to activities other than the solicitation of fraternal insurance contracts from the public and who receives for the solicitation of such contracts no commission or other compensation directly dependent upon the amount of business obtained.

(3) Any agent, representative, or member of a society who devotes, or intends to devote, less than fifty percent of his or her time to the solicitation and procurement of insurance contracts for such society shall be exempt from the requirements of subsection (1) of this section. Any person who in the immediately preceding calendar year has solicited and procured life insurance contracts on behalf of any society in an amount of insurance in excess of fifty thousand dollars or, in the case of any other kind or kinds of insurance which the society might write, on the persons of more than twenty-five individuals and who has received or will receive a commission or other compensation therefor shall be presumed to be devoting, or intending to devote, fifty percent of his or her time to the solicitation or procurement of insurance contracts for such society.

Laws 1985, LB 508, § 33.